Hawaii statutes.
[§466-32] Establishment of peer review
process; confidentiality. (a) There is established a peer review process
to review the attest work of firms. The peer review process shall be for
educational or remedial and not punitive purposes.

(b) The peer review process shall keep
confidential the identity of any person or firm for whom attest work has been
performed by the firm under review.

(c) Neither the proceedings nor the records of
any peer review process shall be subject to discovery. No person involved in
the peer review process shall be required to testify on that process; provided
that statements made by any person in connection with the peer review process
who is a party to an action or proceeding, the subject matter of which was
reviewed in that process, shall be subject to discovery.

(d) This part shall not be construed to
require any firm to become a member of any sponsoring organization. [L 2012, c
324, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next